en: Goat cheeses
bg: Козе сирене и кашкавал
ca: Formatge de cabra
de: Ziegenkäse
es: Queso de cabra
fi: vuohenjuustot
fr: Fromages de chèvre, fromage de chèvre, fromages au lait de chèvre
he: גבינות עזים, גבינות עיזים
hr: Kozji sirevi
it: Formaggio di capra
ja: シェーブルチーズ, 山羊チーズ, 山羊乳チーズ, ヤギ乳チーズ
lt: Ožkų sūriai
nl: Geitenkazen
pl: Ser kozi, Sery kozie
pt: Queijos de cabra
ru: Сыр из козьего молока
tr: Keçi peyniri
zh: 山羊奶酪

en: Semi-dry cheese from goat's milk
fr: Fromage de chèvre demi-sec

en: Dry cheese from goat's milk
fr: Fromage de chèvre sec

es: Rulo de cabra, Rulo de queso de cabra
en: Cheese buche from goat's milk
fr: Bûche de chèvre
hr: Sir buče od kozjeg mlijeka

en: Light cheese buche from goat's milk
fr: Bûche de chèvre allégée en matière grasse

en: Cheese from goat's milk from pasteurised milk
fr: Fromage de chèvre lactique affiné au lait pasteurisé, bûchette pasteurisée de chèvre, crottin pasteurisé de chèvre

en: Fresh goat cheese
fr: Fromage de chèvre frais

en: Cheese from goat's milk fresh from raw milk
fr: Fromage de chèvre frais au lait cru, palet frais de chèvre au lait cru, crottin frais de chèvre au lait cru

en: Cheese from goat's milk fresh
fr: Fromage de chèvre frais au lait pasteurisé ou cru, bûchette de chèvre frais, crottin de chèvre frais

en: Soft-ripened cheese with bloomy rind from goat's milk
fr: Fromage de chèvre à pâte molle et croûte fleurie

en: Spreadable goat cheese, Spreadable cheese from goat's milk
fr: Fromage de chèvre à tartiner

en: Cheeses from the United Kingdom
bg: Сирена от Обединеното кралство
de: Käse aus Großbritannien
es: Quesos del Reino Unido
fi: Juustot Yhdistyneestä kuningaskunnasta
fr: Fromages du Royaume-Uni
he: גבינות בריטיות, גבינות אנגליות, גבינות איריות, גבינות וולשיות, גבינות סקוטיות
hr: Sirevi iz Ujedinjenog Kraljevstva
it: Formaggi dal Regno Unito
lt: Sūriai iš Jungtinės Karalystės
nl: Verenigdkoninkrijkskazen
pl: Sery ze Zjednoczonego Królestwa
pt: Queijos do Reino Unido
ru: Британские сыры

en: Cheeses from England
bg: Сирена от Англия
de: Englischer Käse, Käse aus England
es: Quesos de Inglaterra
fi: Englantilaiset juustot
fr: Fromages d'Angleterre
he: גבינות מאנגליה
hr: Sirevi iz Engleske
it: Formaggi inglesi
lt: Sūriai iš Anglijos
nl: Engelse kazen
pl: Sery angielskie, Sery z Anglii
pt: Queijos de Inglaterra
ru: Английские сыры

en: Applewood cheese
de: Applewood Käse
fr: Applewood
hr: Sir od jabuke

en: Beenleigh Blue cheese
fr: Beenleigh Blue

en: Stilton cheese
bg: Сирене Стилтън

en: Cheeses from Scotland
de: Schottischer Käse, Käse aus Schottland
fr: Fromages d'Ecosse, fromages écossais
hr: Sirevi iz Škotske
nl: Schotse kazen

en: Cheeses from Wales
de: Walisischer Käse
fr: Fromages du Pays de Galles, Fromages gallois
hr: Sirevi iz Walesa
nl: Welshe kazen
pt: Queijos do País de Gales

en: Y Fenni
nl: Y Fenni

en: Cheeses from Northern Ireland
de: Nord Irischer Käse
fr: Fromages d'Irlande du Nord, Fromages nord-irlandais
hr: Sirevi iz sjeverne irske
lt: Sūriai iš Šiaurės Airijos
nl: Noordierse kazen